Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.700

Conformance with chapter 43.97 RCW required.

With respect to the National Scenic Area, as defined in the Columbia River Gorge National Scenic Area Act, P.L. 99-663, the exercise of any power or authority by a city pursuant to this chapter shall be subject to and in conformity with the requirements of chapter 43.97 RCW, including the Interstate Compact adopted by RCW 43.97.015, and with the management plan regulations and ordinances adopted by the Columbia River Gorge commission pursuant to the Compact.

[ 1987 c 499 s 5.]